North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-11 Housing Authorities Law
23-11-26.
Rights and remedies of an obligee of authority.

An obligee of an authority, in addition to all other rights which may be conferred on such obligee, and subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee, may:

By mandamus, suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity, compel the authority and the commissioners, officers, agents, or employees thereof, to perform each and every term, provision, and covenant contained in any contract of the authority with or for the benefit of such obligee, and require the carrying out of any or all such covenants and agreements of said authority and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon said authority by this chapter.

By suit, action, or proceeding in equity, enjoin any act or thing which may be unlawful or in violation of any of the rights of such obligee of the authority.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 102, § 18; R.C. 1943, § 23-1126.

23-11-27.
Additional remedies conferrable by authority on obligee.

An authority, by its resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or other contract, may confer upon any obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, or holding a lease, in addition to all rights that otherwise may be conferred, the right, upon the happening of an event of default as defined in such resolution or instrument, by suit, action, or proceeding, in any court of competent jurisdiction:

To cause possession of any housing project, or any part thereof, to be surrendered to such obligee.

To obtain the appointment of a receiver of any housing project of said authority, or of any part thereof, and of the rents and profits therefrom. If such receiver is appointed, the receiver may enter into and take possession of such housing project, or of any part thereof, and operate and maintain the same and collect and receive all fees, rents, revenues, or other charges thereafter arising therefrom, and the receiver shall keep such moneys in a separate account or accounts and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of the authority as the court shall direct.

To require the authority and the commissioners thereof to account as if it and they were the trustees of an express trust.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 102, § 19; R.C. 1943, § 23-1127.

23-11-28.
Exemption of real property from execution sale.

All real property of an authority, including an authority created under Indian laws recognized by the federal government, is exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution or other judicial process may issue against the same nor may any judgment against any authority be a charge or lien upon its real property. The provisions of this section, however, do not apply to nor limit the right of obligees to foreclose or otherwise enforce any mortgage of an authority or the right of an obligee to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by an authority on its rents, fees, or revenues.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 102, § 20; R.C. 1943, § 23-1128; S.L. 1971, ch. 260, § 1.

23-11-29.
Tax exemptions and payments in lieu of taxes.

The property of an authority used for low-income housing, authority administration, or other property solely owned by the authority and used to conduct the powers granted to the authority in this chapter, including an authority created under Indian laws recognized by the federal government, is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and is exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the state or any political subdivision. In lieu of taxes or special assessments, an authority may agree to make payments to the state or any political subdivision for improvements, services, and facilities furnished by the state or political subdivision for the benefits of a housing project. The payments may not exceed the estimated cost of the improvements, services, or facilities to be so furnished. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the property of an authority used for moderate income housing is exempt from all taxes of the state or any political subdivision except special assessments unless specifically exempted from the special assessment by the political subdivision.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 102, § 22; R.C. 1943, § 23-1129; S.L. 1971, ch. 260, § 2; 2005, ch. 237, § 9; 2013, ch. 211, § 1.

23-11-30.
Reports.

At least once every year, an authority shall file with the city auditor or county auditor, as the case may be, a report of its activities for the preceding year and shall make recommendations with reference to such additional legislation or other action as it deems necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 102, § 23; R.C. 1943, § 23-1130; S.L. 1971, ch. 259, § 3; 1979, ch. 553, § 12; 1983, ch. 570, § 7.

23-11-31.
Houses for workers in national defense and veterans.

Any housing authority may undertake the development and administration of projects to assure the availability of safe and sanitary dwellings for persons engaged in national defense activities who, as determined by the housing authority, would not otherwise be able to secure safe and sanitary dwellings within the vicinity thereof. In the ownership, development, or administration of such projects, a housing authority has all the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities that such authority has under any provisions of law relating to the ownership, development, or administration of slum clearance and housing projects for persons of low income. The authority shall exercise such rights, powers, and privileges as though all the provisions of law applicable to slum clearance and housing projects for persons of low income were applicable to projects developed or administered to assure the availability of safe and sanitary dwellings for persons engaged in national defense activities as provided in this section. Housing projects developed or administered hereunder constitute housing projects under the provisions of this chapter. When a housing authority finds that within its area of operation, or any part thereof, there is an acute shortage of safe and sanitary dwellings which impedes the national defense program or the general welfare of veterans and that necessary and safe and sanitary dwellings would not otherwise be provided when needed for such persons, any project developed or administered by such housing authority or by any housing authority cooperating with such authority pursuant to this section, with the financial aid of the federal government or as agent for the federal government as hereinafter provided, is not subject to the limitations provided in sections 23-11-13 and 23-11-14. Any such finding must be conclusive in any suit, action, or other proceeding. A housing authority may make payments in such amounts as it finds necessary or desirable for any services, facilities, works, privileges, or improvements furnished for or in connection with any such projects. After the national defense period any such projects owned and administered by a housing authority must be administered in accordance with the preceding sections of this chapter except veterans are not subject to the limitations in section 23-11-14.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 217, § 2; 1943, ch. 196, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-1131; S.L. 1949, ch. 191, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 23-1131; S.L. 1977, ch. 225, § 1.

23-11-32.
Cooperation with federal government.

A housing authority may exercise any or all of its powers for the purpose of cooperating with, or acting as agent for, the federal government in the development or administration of projects by the federal government to assure the availability of safe and sanitary dwellings for persons engaged in national defense activities or veterans and may undertake the development or administration of any such projects for the federal government. In order to assure the availability of safe and sanitary housing for persons engaged in national defense activities or for veterans, a housing authority may sell, in whole or in part, to the federal government any housing project developed for such persons but not yet occupied by such persons. Such sale must be at a price and upon those terms the housing authority prescribes and must include provision for the satisfaction of all debts and liabilities of the authority relating to the project.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 217, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 23-1132; S.L. 1949, ch. 191, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 23-1132; 1977, ch. 225, § 2.

23-11-33.
Municipalities may cooperate.

Any city, county, or other public body may cooperate with housing authorities, or with the federal government, with respect to the development or administration of projects, and necessary slum clearance, to assure the availability of safe and sanitary dwellings for persons engaged in national defense activities and for veterans.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 217, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 23-1133; S.L. 1949, ch. 191, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 23-1133; S.L. 1977, ch. 225, § 3.

23-11-34.
Powers of housing authority.

This chapter constitutes an independent authorization for a housing authority to undertake the development or administration of projects to assure the availability of safe and sanitary dwellings for persons engaged in national defense activities and for veterans as provided in this chapter and for a housing authority to cooperate with, or act as agent for, the federal government in the development or administration of similar projects by the federal government. In acting under this authorization, a housing authority is not subject to any limitations, restrictions, or requirements of other laws, except those relating to land acquisition, prescribing the procedure or action to be taken in the development or administration of any public works, including slum clearance and housing projects for such persons or undertakings or projects of municipal or public corporations or political subdivisions or agencies of the state. A housing authority may do any and all things necessary or desirable to cooperate with, or act as agent for, the federal government, or to secure financial aid, in the expeditious development or in the administration of projects to assure the availability of safe and sanitary dwellings for persons engaged in national defense activities and for veterans and to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 217, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 23-1134; S.L. 1949, ch. 191, § 4; 1957 Supp., § 23-1134; S.L. 1977, ch. 225, § 4.

23-11-35.
Definitions.

As used in sections 23-11-31 to 23-11-36:

“Administration” means any and all undertakings necessary for management, operation, or maintenance, in connection with any project, and includes the leasing of any project, in whole or in part, from the federal government.

“Development” means any and all undertakings necessary for the planning, land acquisition, demolition, financing, construction, or equipment in connection with a project, including the negotiation or award of contracts therefor, and includes the acquisition of any project, in whole or in part, from the federal government.

“Federal government” means the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

“Housing authority” means any housing authority established or hereafter established pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

“Persons engaged in national defense activities” includes enlisted men in the military and naval services of the United States, employees of the war and navy departments assigned to duty at military or naval reservations, posts, or bases, and workers engaged or to be engaged in industries connected with and essential to the national defense program, and includes the families of the aforesaid persons who are living with them.

“Persons of low income” means persons or families who lack the amount of income which is necessary, as determined by the housing authority undertaking the housing project, to enable them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding.

“Veteran” means a person, as defined by section 37-01-40, who may be eligible under the terms of sections 23-11-31 through 23-11-34 for aid or assistance.

The development of a project must be deemed to be initiated if a housing authority has issued any bonds, notes, or other obligations with respect to financing the development of such project of the authority, or has contracted with the federal government with respect to the exercise of powers hereunder in the development of such project of the federal government for which an allocation of funds has been made during the existence of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 217, § 6; 1943, ch. 196, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 23-1135; S.L. 1949, ch. 191, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 23-1135; S.L. 1977, ch. 225, § 5.

Cross-References.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-09.

23-11-36.
Powers not limited.

The powers conferred by sections 23-11-31 to 23-11-35 are in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, and nothing contained herein may be construed as limiting any other powers of a housing authority.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 217, § 7; R.C. 1943, § 23-1136.